District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.55

Authorized services.

(a)

A registered pharmacy technician may provide technical pharmacy-related services, as defined through rulemaking, that do not require professional judgment regarding the preparation and distribution of drugs if the technical services are provided under the direct supervision of a pharmacist licensed under this chapter.

(b)

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a registered pharmacy technician shall not provide the following services:

(1)

Drug regimen review;

(2)

Clinical conflict resolution;

(3)

Prescriber contact, except for receiving authorization of prescription refills;

(4)

Therapy modification;

(5)

Patient counseling;

(6)

Dispensing process validation;

(7)

Vaccination or immunization administration;

(8)

Receiving a new prescription drug order over the telephone;

(9)

Any activity required by law or regulation to be performed only by a pharmacist; or

(10)

Any activity for which professional pharmaceutical judgment is required.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 755
as added May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-303, § 2(d), 60 DCR 2711
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-303 added this section.